District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Driver License and Identification Card Renewal Congressional Review
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 110 of Chapter 1 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations (18 DCMR § 110), is amended as follows:
(a) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “Driver Licenses” and
inserting the phrase “Driver Licenses and Identification Cards” in its place.
(b) A new subsection 110.11 is added to read as follows:
“110.11 The Director may waive the requirements of this section, or similar
requirements applicable to the renewal of identification cards, for good cause, as demonstrated
by an applicant in a manner determined by the Department.”.
Sec. 3. Section 7(a)(1) of the District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925, approved March 3,
1925 (43 Stat. 1121; D.C. Official Code § 50-1401.01(a)(1)), is amended by striking the phrase
“8 years plus any time period prior to the expiration date of a previous license not to exceed 2
months, to” and inserting the phrase “8 years, or another time period established by the Mayor
through rulemaking, to” in its place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § l-301.47a).
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2